Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4312
(UDTA 12) Application to cotrustee.

(UDTA 12) The terms of a trust may relieve a cotrustee from duty and liability with respect to another cotrustee's exercise or nonexercise of a power of the other cotrustee to the same extent that in a directed trust a directed trustee is relieved from duty and liability with respect to a trust director's power of direction under sections 30-4309 to 30-4311.

Laws 2019, LB536, § 12.